hu: Úszó rögzítési módja: Fix; Belső zsinórvezetésű; Rögzítőszegecses; Csúszó; Felpattintható; Befűzhető; Egyéb
sl-SI: Način pritrditve plovca: Fiksno; In-line; Klin; Drseče; Z zaponko; Napeljano skozi; Drugo
tr: Şamandıra bağlantı yöntemi: Sabit; İçten geçmeli; Çivili; Kayar; Geçmeli; İpten geçmeli; Diğer
hr-HR: Način pričvršćenja plovka: Fiksno; In-line; Klin; Klizno; Na kopčanje; Provlačenje; Ostalo
fi: Kellukkeen kiinnitysmenetelmä: Kiinteä; Inline; Tappi; Liukuva; Pikakiinnitys; Pujotettava; Muu
cs: Způsob upevnění plováku: Pevné; Průběžné; S kolíčkem; Klouzavé; Nacvakávací; Provlékací; Ostatní
lt-LT: Plūdės tvirtinimo būdas: Fiksuotas; Ištisinis; Su fiksatoriumi; Slenkantis; Užsegamas; Perveriamas; Kita
ko: 부표 부착 방식: 고정식; 인라인; 페그식; 슬립식; 스냅온; 관통형; 기타
ro-RO: Metoda de fixare a plutitorului: Fix; În linie; Pivot; Culisant; Prindere rapidă (snap-on); Trecere prin fir; Altele
zh-TW: 浮標固定方式: 固定式; 中通式; 插梢式; 滑動式; 扣入式; 穿線式; 其他
nb: Festemetode for flyteelement: Fast; Gjennomgående; Låsepinne; Glidende; Klemme; Tredd gjennom; Annet
da: Fastgørelsesmetode for flåd: Fast; Inline; Pind; Glide; Snap-on; Gennemløb; Andet
sv: Fästmetod för flöte: Fast; Inline; Plugg; Glidande; Snap-on; Genomgående; Övrigt
ru: Способ крепления поплавка: Фиксированный; Инлайн; С фиксатором; Скользящий; Защелкивающийся; С пропуском лески; Другое
ja: フロートアタッチメント方法: 固定; インライン; ペグ; スリップ; スナップオン; 糸通し; その他
el: Τρόπος στερέωσης του φλοτέρ: Σταθερό; Εν σειρά (Inline); Πείρος (Peg); Συρόμενο (Slip); Κουμπωτό; Περαστό; Άλλο
es: Método de sujeción de flotante: Fijo; En línea; Con pasador; Deslizante; A presión; De hilo pasante; Otro
nl: Bevestigingsmethode dobber: Vast; Inline; Pen; Schuivend; Klikbevestiging; Doorvoer; Overige
fr: Méthode de fixation par flotteur: Fixe; En ligne; À cheville; Coulissant; À clipser; À enfiler; Autre
de: Posenbefestigungsmethode: Fest; Inline; Stift; Laufmontage; Zum Aufstecken; Zum Durchfädeln; Sonstiges
it: Metodo di fissaggio del galleggiante: Fisso; In linea; A piolo; Scorrevole; A scatto; Passante; Altro
pt-PT: Método de fixação da boia: Fixo; Em linha; Pino; Deslizante; Encaixe; Passagem de fio; Outro
th: วิธีการติดทุ่น: แบบตายตัว; อินไลน์; แบบหมุด; แบบสลิป; แบบหนีบ; ร้อยเชือก; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Metóda upevnenia plaváku: Pevný; Priebežný; Na kolík; Kĺzavý; Pripínací; Prevliekací; Iné
bg-BG: Начин на закрепяне на плувката: Фиксиран; Инлайн; С щифт; Плъзгащ; С щипка; С провиране; Друго
vi: Phương pháp gắn phao: Cố định; Xuyên tâm; Chốt; Trượt; Kẹp; Xỏ cước; Khác
pt-BR: Método de fixação de flutuação: Fixo; Em linha; Pino; Deslizante; Encaixe; Passante; Outro
zh-CN: 浮漂固定方式: 固定式; 穿线式; 插针式; 滑动式; 按扣式; 穿孔式; 其他
en: Float attachment method: Fixed; Inline; Peg; Slip; Snap-on; Thread-through; Other
pl: Metoda mocowania pływaka: Stały; Przelotowy; Na kołek; Ślizgowy; Zatrzaskowy; Przewlekany; Inny